North Carolina statutes. Chapter 113. Conservation and Development.
Part 1. General Provisions.

§ 113-378.
Persons drilling for oil or gas to register and furnish bond.

Any person, firm or corporation before making any drilling exploration in this State for oil or natural gas shall register with the Department of Environmental Quality. To provide for such registration, the drilling operator must furnish the name and address of such person, firm or corporation, and the location of the proposed drilling operations, and file with the Department a bond running to the State of North Carolina in an amount totaling the sum of (i) five thousand dollars ($5,000) plus (ii) one dollar ($1.00) per linear foot proposed to be drilled for the well. Any well opened by the drilling operator shall be plugged upon abandonment in accordance with the rules of the Department.

History.

1945, c. 765, s. 2; 1971, c. 813, s. 1; 1973, c. 1262, s. 86; 1977, c. 771, s. 4; 1987, c. 827, s. 110; 1989, c. 727, s. 118; 1997-443, s. 11A.119(a); 2011-276, s. 1; 2013-365, s. 5(a); 2015-241, s. 14.30(u).

§ 113-379.
Filing log of drilling and development of each well.

Upon the completion or shutting down of any abandoned well, the drilling operator shall file with the Department or other State agency, or with any division thereof hereinafter created for the regulation of drilling for oil or natural gas, a complete log of the drilling and development of each well.

History.

1945, c. 765, s. 3; 1973, c. 1262, s. 86; 1977, c. 771, s. 4; 1989, c. 727, s. 119.

§ 113-380.
Violation a misdemeanor.

Except as otherwise provided, any person, firm or officer of a corporation violating any of the provisions of this Article shall upon conviction thereof be guilty of a Class 1 misdemeanor.

History.

1945, c. 765, s. 4; 1971, c. 813, s. 2; 1993, c. 539, s. 870; 1994, Ex. Sess., c. 24, s. 14(c); 2012-143, s. 2(a).

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2012-143, s. 2(a), effective August 1, 2012, added the exception at the beginning, and substituted “this Article” for “G.S. 113-378 or 113-379.”